Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.18.152.
Prohibited acts for home inspectors.

An individual registered under this chapter as a home inspector or associate home inspector may not

perform or offer to perform, for an additional fee, repairs to a subject property on which the home inspector or the home inspector’s company has prepared a home inspection report in the past 12 months;

inspect for a fee any property in which the home inspector or the home inspector’s company has a financial interest or an interest in the transfer of the property;

offer or deliver compensation, an inducement, or a reward to the owner of the inspected property, the broker, or the agent, for the referral of business to the home inspector or the home inspector’s company;

without the written consent of the home inspection client or the client’s legal representative, disclose information from a home inspection report prepared by the home inspector or the home inspector’s company unless the disclosure is made

to a subsequent client who requests a home inspection of the same premises; or

by the home inspector in an administrative or judicial proceeding in which disclosure of the home inspection report is relevant to resolution of the legal issues in the proceeding;

without the written consent of all interested parties, accept compensation from more than one interested party for the same home inspection services;

accept from a person who has other dealings with a home inspection client a commission or allowance, directly or indirectly, for work for which the home inspector or the home inspector’s company is responsible;

accept an engagement to make an inspection or to prepare a report in which the employment itself or the fee payable for the inspection is contingent upon the conclusions in the report, preestablished findings, or the close of escrow.

History.

(§ 31 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For violation of this section as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Sec. 08.18.154.
Limitation on home inspector’s activities.

A registration issued under AS

08.18.022

does not authorize the holder to perform an activity for which a license is required under provisions of this title that are outside of this chapter.

History.

(§ 31 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Sec. 08.18.156.
Exemptions related to home inspections.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, an individual who inspects a home is not required to be registered under this chapter as a home inspector or associate home inspector if the individual is

employed by the federal or state government, a political subdivision of the state, a regional housing authority created under AS

18.55.996(b)

, or a municipality or unincorporated community and the employee is performing only duties that are within the employee’s official duties;

performing a home inspection only with respect to property that is the individual’s residence or in which the individual has a financial interest;

registered as an engineer or architect under AS 08.48, prepares a written report after the inspection, affixes the individual’s seal to the home inspection report, signs and dates the report, and puts the individual’s registration number on the report;

engaged as an engineer in training or architect in training who works for and is supervised by a person described in (3) of this subsection and the person described in (3) of this subsection affixes the person’s seal to the home inspection report, signs and dates the report, and puts the person’s registration number on the report;

licensed as a pesticide applicator by the Department of Environmental Conservation and is performing only activities within the scope of that license;

registered as a general contractor with a residential contractor endorsement under this chapter and is performing only activities within the scope of that registration;

certified as any type of real estate appraiser under AS 08.87 and is performing only activities that are authorized under that certification; or

only determining whether a building complies with the thermal and lighting energy standards required by AS

46.11.040

.

Notwithstanding the definition of “home inspection” in AS

08.18.171

(8), an individual is not considered to be doing a home inspection for purposes of this chapter if the individual

is in the business of repairing, maintaining, or installing any of the systems or components listed in AS

08.18.171

(8); and

inspects the system or component for the sole purpose of determining the condition of the system or component before performing or offering to perform repair, maintenance, or installation work on the system or component.

History.

(§ 31 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

08.18.171

(8)” was substituted for “AS

08.18.171

(12)” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 08.18.171(12).

Sec. 08.18.160.
Written examination. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.161.
Exemptions.

To the extent that this chapter governs contractors, this chapter does not apply to

an authorized representative of the United States government, the state, or a political subdivision or agency of the state;

an officer of a court when acting within the scope of office;

a public utility operating under the regulations of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska in construction, maintenance, or development work incidental to its own business;

a construction, repair, or operation incidental to the discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing, abandoning, or other operation of a petroleum or gas well or a surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an owner or lessee;

the sale or installation of finished products, materials, or articles of merchandise that are not actually fabricated into and do not become a permanent, fixed part of a structure;

construction, alteration, or repair of personal property;

a person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of, the work of the contractor;

an owner who contracts for a project with a registered contractor;

a person working on an existing structure on that person’s own property, whether occupied by the person or not, and a person working on that person’s own existing residence, whether owned by the person or not;

an owner or tenant of commercial property who uses the owner’s or tenant’s own employees to do maintenance, repair, and alteration work on that property;

an owner who acts as the owner’s own contractor and in doing so performs the work independently or hires workers or subcontractors, purchases materials, and, as such, sees to the paying for all labor, subcontractors, and materials; in this case, the owner shall be limited to construction of one home, duplex, triplex, four-plex, or commercial building every two years; an owner who advertises the structure under construction for sale or sells the structure during the period of construction or within two years after the period of construction begins shall file, on forms provided by the department, a notice indicating that the owner is not engaged in a business for which the owner is required to register as a contractor under this chapter; for the purposes of this paragraph, construction begins on the date that is the earlier of when the owner

begins the actual construction work; or

enters into an agreement with another person for the other person to provide labor, to act as a subcontractor, or to provide materials for the construction;

a person performing construction work incidental to farming, dairying, agriculture, horticulture, stock or poultry raising, mining, logging, fishing, clearing, or other work on the land in rural districts for fire prevention purposes, or access road building, unless the person is a licensee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 3 ch 108 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 121 SLA 1990; am § 32 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 144 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 9 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 70 SLA 2014; am § 11 ch 59 SLA 2018; am § 20 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2009, in (3) of this section, “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “public service commission” to correct a manifest error in ch. 113, SLA 1970.

Cross references. —

For Regulatory Commission of Alaska, see AS 42.04.

For provision providing legislative intent for this section, see sec. 1, ch. 59, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.
For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 12(c), ch. 59, SLA 2018 in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, repealed (8).

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, redesignated former (9) as (8), in (9), inserted “an existing structure on” following “a person working on” and substituted “own existing residence” for “own residence”; in (11), substituted “performs the work independently or hires workers or subcontractors” for “hires workers on an hourly basis, hires subcontractors”, added the language beginning “an owner who advertises the structure under construction for sale or sells the structure during the period of construction” to the end of the paragraph; made related and stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (1), substituted “the state” for “the state of Alaska”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Public utilities are clearly exempt both from construction contractor registration under AS 08.18 and from electrical administrator licensing under AS 08.40, regardless of whether they are bidding against others who are not public utilities for work on projects which are not part of the utility distribution system. June 6, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 08.18.170.
Licensing of applicants other than individuals. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.171.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“builder” means general contractor;

“cash deposit” means a cash deposit or other negotiable security filed with the commissioner in lieu of a surety bond under AS

08.18.071(b)

;

“commissioner,” unless the text reads otherwise, means the commissioner of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“contractor” means a person who, in the pursuit of an independent business, undertakes or offers to perform, or claims to have the capacity to perform, or submits a bid for a project to construct, alter, repair, move, or demolish a building, highway, road, railroad, or any type of fixed structure, including excavation and site development and erection of scaffolding; “contractor” includes a general contractor, builder, mechanical contractor, specialty contractor, and subcontractor;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, unless the context indicates otherwise;

“existing home” means a residence previously occupied as a residence;

“general contractor” means a contractor whose business operations require the use of more than three trades or the use of mechanical or specialty contractors and subcontractors who are under the supervision of the contractor;

“home inspection” means a visual examination, performed in accordance with standards of practice adopted by the department, of the readily accessible parts of one or more of the following systems and components of a residence or intended residence:

heating and air-conditioning systems;

plumbing and electrical systems;

built-in appliances;

roof, attic, and visible insulation;

walls, ceilings, floors, windows, and doors;

foundation and basement;

visible interior and exterior structures;

drainage to and from the residence;

other systems or components as specified by the department in regulations;

“home inspector” means an individual who performs or offers to perform a home inspection for a fee;

“joint registration” means a certificate of registration that authorizes an individual to inspect both new homes and existing homes;

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“mechanical contractor” means a contractor whose business operations involve plumbing, pipe fitting, sheet metal, heating, air conditioning, ventilating, or sprinkler and dry chemical fire protection trades in order to install or modify mechanical piping and systems, devices, fixtures, and equipment or other mechanical materials subject to the following codes as published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials or the International Conference of Building Officials:

Uniform Plumbing Code;

Uniform Swimming Pool, Spa, and Hot Tub Code;

Uniform Solar Energy Code; and

Uniform Mechanical Code;

“new home” means a residence not previously occupied as a residence;

“residence” means

a single-family home other than a mobile home;

a duplex, triplex, or four-plex; or

a residential townhouse or residential condominium unit;

“residential contractor” means a general contractor whose business and operation involve undertaking the construction or alteration of a privately-owned residential structure of one to four units that is used or intended to be used as a human dwelling;

“specialty contractor” means a contractor, other than a mechanical contractor, whose business operations are described in AS

08.18.024(b)

;

“trade” means a skill used in the field of construction, as defined by regulation by the department;

“visual examination” means an examination performed in person at the physical location of the residence except that, if a method other than personal physical inspection has been approved by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation under AS

18.56.300(b)

, use of the other approved method constitutes a visual examination under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 1971; am § 41 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 15 SLA 1977; am § 10 ch 83 SLA 1985; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 99 SLA 1990; am § 33 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 144 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 to alphabetize the defined terms, and in 1988, 1990, and 2003 to maintain alphabetical order.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For specialty contractor trades, see 12 AAC 21, art. 2.

For mechanical contractor, see 12 AAC 21, art. 3.

Editor's notes. --

In 1994, the International Conference of Building Officials merged with two other organizations to form the International Code Council.

Secs. 08.18.180 — 08.18.350.
Bond; issuance of license; form and conditions of license; license fees; license renewal; investigations; suspension and revocation of licenses; hearing; renewal of license after suspension or revocation; prohibited acts; disability; lien laws; disclosure of financial information; definitions; short title. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]